Vermont, session 2025-2026, H445.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
It is the intent of the Vermont General Assembly to support the human right
of housing and to promote public health and community safety during recovery
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 2 of 9
from the COVID-19 pandemic, the polysubstance pandemic, and climate
disasters by preserving affordable housing and creating new social and
economic opportunities for the development and maintenance of sustainable,
resilient, and affordable housing infrastructure. It is the intent of this act to
focus State, municipal, and private resources on assisting tenants recovering
from emergencies and on ensuring that, in the long term, Vermonters have an
adequate supply of safe, affordable housing, including more opportunities for
access and ownership of land and community resources.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 435(b) is amended to read:
(b) The General Fund shall be composed of revenues from the following
sources:
* * *
(5) individual income taxes levied pursuant to chapter 151 of this title,
except for revenue levied and transferred pursuant to subdivision 5822(a)(7) of
this title;
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5822 is amended to read:
§ 5822. TAX ON INCOME OF INDIVIDUALS, ESTATES, AND TRUSTS
(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income earned
or received in that year by every individual estate, and trust, subject to income
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 3 of 9
taxation under the laws of the United States, in an amount determined by the
following tables, and adjusted as required under this section.
* * *
(7)(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer exceeds
$500,000.00, then the rate of taxation under subdivisions (1)–(6) of this
subsection (a) on income over that amount shall be increased by one and one-
half percent.
(B) Each year, on July 1, the Department of Finance and
Management shall estimate the amount of revenue raised under subdivision
(A) of this subdivision (7) in the prior taxable year and that same amount shall
be transferred from the General Fund to the Land Access and Opportunity
Revolving Fund created under 10 V.S.A. § 325w.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. chapter 15, subchapter 5 is amended to read:
Subchapter 5. Land Access and Opportunity Board
§ 325t. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Board” means the Vermont Land Access and Opportunity Board.
(2) “Fund” means the Land Access and Opportunity Revolving Fund.
(3) “Historically marginalized or disadvantaged community” means a
community that has historically suffered from discrimination and has not had
equal access to public or private economic benefits due to the race, ethnicity,
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 4 of 9
gender, geography, language preference, immigrant or citizen status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, socioeconomic status, or disability status of its
members.
(3)(4) “LGBTQ” means an individual who identifies as lesbian, gay,
bisexual, transgender, queer, or questioning.
(4)(5) “VHCB” means the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board.
§ 325u. VERMONT LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY BOARD
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Land Access and Opportunity
Board to promote improvements in access to woodlands, farmland, and land
and home ownership for Vermonters from historically marginalized or
disadvantaged communities who continue to face barriers to land and home
ownership. The Board shall be attached to the Vermont Housing and
Conservation Board for administrative purposes.
(b) Organization of Board. The Board shall be composed of:
* * *
(10) one member, appointed by the Vermont Developmental Disabilities
Council; and
(11) one member, appointed by Vermont Psychiatric Survivors
MadFreedom, Inc; and
(12) one member, appointed by Migrant Justice.
* * *
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 5 of 9
§ 325w. LAND ACCESS AND OPPORTUNITY REVOLVING FUND
(a) There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the
“Land Access and Opportunity Revolving Fund.” The Fund shall be
administered by the Board with support from the VHCB.
(b) Expenditures from the Fund shall only be made to implement and
effectuate the purposes of this subchapter. Unexpended balances and any
earnings shall remain in the Fund for use in accord with the purposes of this
subchapter.
(c) Upon application from an eligible applicant in a form prescribed by the
Board, the Board may provide funding in the form of grants or loans for the
following eligible activities:
(1) the purchase of buildings and land by current tenants to expand
access to owner-occupied affordable housing;
(2) the renovation of owner-occupied multi-unit housing to expand
access to sustainable affordable housing;
(3) the development of affordable housing infrastructure for land owned
through a residential cooperative or other form of collective ownership; and
(4) the development of affordable transitional housing for members of
historically marginalized or disadvantaged communities with a priority for
projects that lead to collective ownership.
(d) The Board shall prioritize funding for projects that:
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 6 of 9
(1) create self-sufficient neighborhoods and communities that use
intersectional and circular design, such as localized waste management,
regenerative agricultural practices, and independent energy generation;
(2) develop sustainable social and physical infrastructure that expands
access to community resources, such as tool banks, labor pools, and workforce
training programs; and
(3) support members from historically marginalized or disadvantaged
communities, including individuals who experience homelessness, substance
use disorder, or mental or physical disabilities; individuals who have a history
of incarceration or involvement in the justice system; youth with a history of
interaction with the Department for Children and Families; or the elderly.
(e) The Board shall work with the Vermont Housing and Finance Agency,
the VHCB, the Agency of Human Services, and the Department of Housing
and Community Development to identify and propose pilot projects to award
funding under this section that:
(1) identify public land and buildings in areas designated for the
development of housing to integrate affordable housing into neighborhoods
and communities;
(2) support cooperative management or ownership;
(3) integrate community resources;
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 7 of 9
(4) co-locate health resources, workforce development opportunities, or
food access;
(5) provide for circular waste management and energy production and
storage within the project or neighborhood; and
(6) propose additional incentives for public-private partnerships and
coordinated development of the neighborhood surrounding the affordable
housing infrastructure.
(f)(1) Annually on or before January 31, the Board shall submit a report
concerning its activities under this section to the Governor and the General
Assembly. The report shall include a list and description of activities funded
by the Board during the preceding year, including commitments made to fund
projects, and a full financial report of the Board’s activities.
(2) The provisions of 2 V.S.A. § 20(d) (expiration of required reports)
shall not apply to the report to be made under this section.
Sec. 5. PRESERVATION OF AFFORDABLE HOUSING TAX REPORT
On or before July 1, 2026, the Department of Taxes in collaboration with
the Joint Fiscal Office shall issue a report to the General Assembly evaluating
the tax incentives and penalties that purport to preserve affordable housing in
Vermont. The report shall:
(1) consider various definitions and measurements of affordability for
tenants, including the basic needs budget;
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 8 of 9
(2) consider variables impacting the price of rent for property owners,
including the cost and benefits of rent pricing;
(3) project how tax incentives for affordable rent might amplify existing
tax benefits for owners;
(4) project how tax penalties on rent prices would deter owners from
charging excessive rent prices;
(5) project how tax incentives for property owners giving tenants the
first right of refusal to purchase property under rent could encourage home
ownership for tenants; and
(6) project the fiscal impact of these various tax incentives and penalties
on the revenues of the State.
Sec. 6. REPEAL
32 V.S.A. § 5822(a)(7) (personal income tax surcharge) is repealed.
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 435(b)(5) is amended to read:
(5) individual income taxes levied pursuant to chapter 151 of this title,
except for revenue levied and transferred pursuant to subdivision 5822(a)(7) of
this title;
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this section and Secs. 2. (General
Fund allocation) and 3 (income tax surcharge) shall take effect retroactively on
VT LEG #380430 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.445
2025 Page 9 of 9
January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years beginning on and after
January 1, 2025.
(b) Secs. 6 and 7 (repeal of surcharge) shall take effect on January 1, 2031
and shall apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2031.
(c) The remainder of this act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380430 v.1